Oklahoma, session 2025, SB985.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-60.7 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
shall operate an “Oklahoma Local Food for Schools” program for the
purpose of facilitating the purchase of local foods by school
districts.
B. The Department shall encourage school districts to partner
with local producers and meat processors by providing reimbursement
to the school district for local food costs.
C. The Department is authorized to promulgate rules necessary
for the implementation of this act.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB985 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-60.8 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry to be
designated the “Oklahoma Local Food for Schools Revolving Fund”.
The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Department from legislative appropriations for the purpose of
facilitating the purchase of local food by school districts pursuant
to the Oklahoma Local Food for Schools program created in Section 1
of this act. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are
hereby appropriated and may be expended by the Department for the
purpose provided for in this section. Expenditures from the fund
shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against
claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
February 20, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED





SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB985 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)